Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-408 Confidentiality and prohibition
on announcements; prohibition on use in ratemaking. (a) All
risk-based capital reports, to the extent the information contained in the
report is not required to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement
schedule, and risk-based capital plans, including the results or report of any
examination or analysis of an insurer performed pursuant to this part and any
corrective order issued by the commissioner pursuant to examination or
analysis, with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer that are in
the possession or under the control of the commissioner shall be confidential
by law and shall be privileged. Risk-based capital reports and risk-based
capital plans subject to this section shall not be made public, shall not be
subject to subpoena or discovery, and shall not be admissible as evidence in
any private civil action; provided that:

(1) This section shall not be construed to limit the
commissioner's authority to use the documents, materials, or other information
in furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as part of the
commissioner's official duties; and

(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who
received documents, materials, or other information while acting under the
authority of the commissioner shall be permitted or required to testify in any
private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or
information subject to this subsection.

(b) The commissioner may share documents,
materials, or other information, including confidential and privileged
documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (a), with other
state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and
with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities; provided
that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidential and privileged status of
the document, material, or other information and has the legal authority to do
so.

(c) The commissioner may receive documents,
materials, or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged
documents, materials, or information, from the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic
jurisdictions. The commissioner shall maintain as confidential or privileged,
pursuant to subsection (a)(2), any document, material, or information received
with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under
the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
information.

(d) The commissioner may enter into agreements
governing sharing and use of information consistent with subsections (b) and
(c).

(e) No waiver of any applicable privilege or
claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information subject to
this section shall occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under
this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsections (b) and
(c).

(f) The comparison of an insurer's total
adjusted capital to any of its risk-based capital levels is a regulatory tool
which may indicate the need for possible corrective action with respect to the
insurer and is not intended as a means to rank insurers generally. Except as
otherwise required under this part, making, publishing, disseminating,
circulating, or placing before the public or causing, directly or indirectly,
to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public in
a newspaper, magazine, or other publication; in the form of a notice, circular,
pamphlet, letter, or poster; over any radio or television station; or in any
other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an
assertion, representation, or statement with regard to the risk-based capital
levels of any insurer or of any component derived in the calculation by any
insurer, producer, or other person engaged in any manner in the insurance business
is misleading and is prohibited. If any materially false statement with
respect to the comparison of an insurer's total adjusted capital to any or all
of its risk-based capital levels or any inappropriate comparison of any other
amount to the insurer's risk-based capital levels is published in any written
publication and the insurer is able to demonstrate to the commissioner with
substantial proof the falsity or inappropriateness of the statement then the
insurer may publish an announcement in a written publication for the sole
purpose of rebutting the materially false or inappropriate statement.

(g) Risk-based capital instructions,
risk-based capital reports, adjusted risk-based capital reports, risk-based
capital plans, and revised risk-based capital plans are intended solely for use
by the commissioner in monitoring the solvency of insurers and the need for
possible corrective action with respect to insurers and shall not be used by
the commissioner for ratemaking, considered or introduced as evidence in any
rate proceeding, or used by the commissioner to calculate or derive any
elements of an appropriate premium level or rate of return for any line of
insurance which an insurer or any affiliate is authorized to write. [L 1994, c
190, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 61, §2 as superseded by c 232, §4; am L 1997, c 75,
§11; am L 1999, c 128, §2; am L 2003, c 212, §29; am L 2011, c 80, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next